Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 7, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 20G), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20G. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or
after January 1, 2026, Class B2 shall include the following criminal
offenses:
1. Transport, move, Transporting, moving, or attempt attempting
to transport in this state any alien knowing that the alien has
entered the United States in violation of law, as provided for in

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2041 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

subs ection A of Section 446 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
2. Conceal, harbor, Concealing, harboring, or shelter
sheltering from detection any alien in any place within this state
knowing that the alien has entered the United States in violation of
law, as provided for in subsection B of Section 446 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
3. Intentionally destroy, hide, alter, abscond destroying,
hiding, altering, absconding with, or keep keeping certain
identification documentation of an individual for the purpose of
trafficking the individual, as provided for in subsection C of
Section 446 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
4. Allowing any person lawfully held in custody to escape or go
at large by a sheriff, deputy, coroner, clerk of a court, constable,
or other ministerial officer, as provided for in Section 532 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
5. Kidnapping, as provided for in Section 741 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
6. Causing, aiding, abetting, or encouraging a minor child to
distribute, dispense, possess, or manufacture a controlled dangerous
substance or a counterfeit or imitation controlled dangerous
substance, as provided for in Section 856.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2041 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. Trafficking in children, as provided for in Section 866 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
8. Photographing, publishing, distributing, or participating in
the preparation of child pornography sexual abuse material, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 1040.8 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
9. Procuring another for the purpose of prostitution, as
provided for in Section 1081 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
10. Keeping, holding, detaining, or restraining against her
will a female in a house of prostitution, as provided for in Section
1085 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
11. Rape in the second degree, as provided for in subsection B
of Section 1114 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
12. Arson in the second degree, as provided for in Section 1402
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
13. Second or subsequent conviction of residing, either
temporarily or permanently, within a two-thousand-foot radius of a
public or private school, playground, park, licensed child care
center, family child care home, or residence of a victim by a person
who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to the Sex
Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 590 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2041 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

14. Second or subsequent conviction for residing with a minor
child by a person who is required to register as a sex offender
pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act for an offense in
which a minor child was the victim, as provided for in subsection B
of Section 590 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
15. Breaking into and entering the dwelling house of a
defendant by a bail enforcer, as provided for in Section 1350.6 of
Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
16. Possessing a drug product containing ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine with intent to use the
product as a precursor to manufacture methamphetamine or other
controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-
332 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
17. Third offense of possessing methamphetamine, cocaine, or
fentanyl within ten (10) years as provided for in subparagraph b of
paragraph 3 of subsection B of Section 2-402 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
18. Fourth or subsequent offense within ten (10) years of
knowingly or intentionally possessing, buying, or selling a
controlled dangerous substance as provided for in paragraph 4 of
subsection B of Section 2-402 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
19. Aggravated trafficking of marijuana, as provided for in
subparagraph b of paragraph 1 of subsection C of Section 2-415 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2041 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

18. 20. Aggravated trafficking of cocaine, coca leaves, or
cocaine base, as provided for in subparagraph c of paragraph 2 of
subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
19. 21. Aggravated trafficking of heroin, as provided for in
subparagraph b of paragraph 3 of subsection C of Section 2-415 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. 22. Aggravated trafficking of amphetamine or
methamphetamine, as provided for in subparagraph c of paragraph 4 of
subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
21. 23. Aggravated trafficking of lysergic acid diethylamide
(LSD), as provided for in subparagraph b of paragraph 5 of
subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
and
22. 24. Aggravated trafficking of phencyclidine (PCP), as
provided for in subparagraph b of paragraph 6 of subsection C of
Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class B2 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the
corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-402, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 266, O.S.L. 2023 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 2-402), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-402. A. 1. It shall be unlawful for any person
knowingly or intentionally to possess a controlled dangerous
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2041 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

subs tance unless such substance was obtained directly, or pursuant
to a valid prescription or order from a practitioner, while acting
in the course of his or her professional practice, or except as
otherwise authorized by Section 2-101 et seq. of this title.
2. It shall be unlawful for any person to purchase any
preparation excepted from the provisions of the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act pursuant to Section 2-313 of this title in
an amount or within a time interval other than that permitted by
Section 2-313 of this title.
3. It shall be unlawful for any person or business to sell,
market, advertise, or label any product containing ephedrine, its
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, for the
indication of stimulation, mental alertness, weight loss, appetite
control, muscle development, energy, or other indication which is
not approved by the pertinent federal OTC Final Monograph, Tentative
Final Monograph, or FDA-approved new drug application or its legal
equivalent. In determining compliance with this requirement, the
following factors shall be considered:
a. the packaging of the product,
b. the name of the product, and
c. the distribution and promotion of the product,
including verbal representations made at the point of
sale.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2041 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. 1. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by confinement imprisonment in a county jail
for not more than one (1) year and by a fine not exceeding One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).
2. Any person who violates this section a second time within
ten (10) years, upon conviction, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
The court may, with the consent of the defendant, order the
defendant to complete a substance abuse assessment and evaluation
and to complete a diversion program for up to one (1) year following
the date of conviction in lieu of other punishments. At the
discretion of the court, the diversion program may include drug
testing as a requirement. If the defendant refuses or fails to
complete the assessment and evaluation or diversion program, the
court may impose punishment as provided for in paragraph 1 of this
subsection. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to
violations related to the possession of marijuana.
3. a. Any person who violates this section a third time
within ten (10) years shall, upon conviction, be
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not
exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00),
imprisonment in the county jail for a minimum of
thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2041 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. Any person who possesses methamphetamine, cocaine, or
fentanyl in violation of this section for a third time
within ten (10) years, shall, upon conviction, be
guilty of a Class B2 felony offense punishable by a
fine not exceeding Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00),
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for not more than four (4) years, or by
both such fine and imprisonment.
The court may, with the consent of the defendant, order the
defendant to complete a substance abuse assessment and evaluation
and to complete a diversion program for up to three (3) years
following the date of conviction. At the discretion of the court,
the diversion program may include drug testing as a requirement. If
the defendant refuses or fails to complete the assessment and
evaluation or diversion program, the court may impose punishment as
provided for in paragraph 1 of this subsection. The provisions of
this paragraph shall not apply to violations related to the
possession of marijuana.
4. a. Any person who violates this section a fourth time
within ten (10) years shall, upon conviction, be
guilty of a Class B2 felony punishable by a fine not
exceeding Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00),
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2041 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

than five (5) years, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
b. Upon a verdict or plea of guilty or upon a plea of
nolo contendere, but before a judgment of guilt of a
violation of this paragraph, the court may, without
entering a judgment of guilt and with the consent of
the defendant, defer further proceedings upon the
specific conditions prescribed by the court not to
exceed a three-year period. The court may, with the
consent of the defendant, order the defendant to
complete a substance abuse assessment and evaluation
and to complete a diversion program for up to three
(3) years.
c. Upon successful completion of the court-ordered
substance abuse assessment and evaluation and
diversion program within the time prescribed, the
felony charge shall be changed to a misdemeanor. If
the defendant refuses or fails to complete the
assessment and evaluation or diversion program, the
court may impose punishment as provided for in
subparagraph a of this paragraph.
d. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to
violations related to the possession of marijuana.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2041 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. Any person convicted of any offense described in this
section shall, in addition to any fine imposed, pay a special
assessment trauma-care fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) to be
deposited into the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in
Section 1-2530.9 of this title.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 10, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS

















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2041 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)